en: Top length type: Bodysuit; Crop top; Long; Medium; Other
ko: 상단 길이 유형: 바디수트; 크롭탑; 롱; 매체; 기타
vi: Loại chiều dài trên: Áo liền quần bó sát; Áo hở eo; Dài; Vừa; Khác
ru: Длина верха: Боди; Укороченный топ; Длинный; Средний; Другой
zh-TW: 上衣長度類型: 連體衣; 短版上衣; 長; 媒介; 其他
hr-HR: Duljina majice: Bodi; Rezana majica; Duga; Poluduga; Ostalo
hu: Top hossztípusa: Body; Crop top; Hosszú; Közepes; Egyéb
da: Toplængdetype: Bodysuit; Crop top; Lang; Medium; Andet
nb: Type topplengde: Kroppsdrakt; Kort topp; Lang; Middels; Annet
tr: Üst uzunluk türü: Zıbın; Crop; Uzun; Orta; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip lungime topuri: Body; Cropped; Lung; Mediu; Altele
sk-SK: Dĺžka zvršku: Body; Trojštvrťový; Dlhý; Stredný; Iné
cs: Typ délky topu: Body; Crop top; Dlouhé; Médium; Jiné
sv: Typ av topplängd: Kroppsdräkt; Crop top; Lång; Medium; Övrigt
sl-SI: Dolžina zgornjega dela oblačila: Kombinezon; Kratek top; Dolga; Srednja; Drugo
it: Tipo di lunghezza della parte superiore: Body; Top corto; Lungo; Medio; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de comprimento superior: Body; Top curto; Comprido; Médio; Outro
de: Oberlängentyp: Einteiler; Crop-Top; Lang; Medium; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de largo del top: Enterizo; Top corto; Largo; Medio; Otros
zh-CN: 顶部长度类型: 连体衣; 短款上衣; 长; 媒介; 其他
fi: Topin pituustyyppi: Body; Napapaita; Pitkä; Keskimääräinen; Muu
pl: Typ długości topu: Body; Odcięta góra; Długie; Środek; Inne
ja: トップスの長さの種類: ボディスーツ; クロップトップス; ロング; 媒体; その他
th: ประเภทความยาวของเสื้อ: บอดี้สูท; เสื้อครอป; ยาว; สื่อ; อื่นๆ
fr: Type de longueur du haut: Body; Crop top; Long; Moyen; Autre
lt-LT: Palaidinės ilgio tipas: Glaustinukė; Pilvo nedengiantys marškinėliai; Ilga; Vidutinė; Kita
bg-BG: Тип дължина на горна дреха: Боди; Кроп топ; Дълго; Средно; Други
pt-BR: Tipo de comprimento do top: Body; Cropped; Longo; Médio; Outro
nl: Lengtetype bovenstuk: Bodysuit; Croptop; Lang; Medium; Andere
el: Τύπος μήκους μπλούζας: Κορμάκι; Κοντά μπλουζάκια; Μακρύ; Μέση; Άλλο